Tennessee, session 114, HB1964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-15-5001, is amended by deleting
"For the purpose of determining" in subsection (a) and substituting instead "Effective until
September 1, 2030, for the purpose of determining" and adding the following new subsections:
(e) Subsections (a)–(d) apply to determinations of compensation, salaries, and
adjustments until September 1, 2030, and are deleted on September 1, 2030.
Subsections (f)–(i) apply to determinations of compensation, salaries, and adjustments
on or after September 1, 2030. This subsection (e) is deleted on September 1, 2030.
(f) Effective September 1, 2030, for the purpose of determining the
compensation of a general sessions judge or juvenile judge, the counties of this state
are divided into five (5) classes as follows:
(1) Counties having a population of more than forty-nine thousand
(49,000) constitute counties of the first class;
(2) Counties having a population of more than thirty-eight thousand
(38,000) but not more than forty-nine thousand (49,000) constitute counties of
the second class;
(3) Counties having a population of more than thirty thousand (30,000)
but not more than thirty-eight thousand (38,000) constitute counties of the third
class;
HB1964
010201
- 1 -

(4) Counties having a population of more than fifteen thousand (15,000)
but not more than thirty thousand (30,000) constitute counties of the fourth class;
and
(5) Counties having a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or less,
constitute counties of the fifth class.
(g) The class into which a county falls must be determined by the 2020 federal
census or a subsequent federal census or a special census conducted by the
department of economic and community development.
(h)
(1) For the purpose of determining the compensation of a general
sessions judge who presides over a consolidated general sessions court
consisting of two (2) or more counties, the populations of all counties served by
the court must be added together, and the resultant sum must be increased to
the next higher classification for the purpose of determining the class of counties
in accordance with subsection (f).
(2) Each county served by a consolidated general sessions court shall
pay its proportional share of the compensation of the judge or judges of the
consolidated court based on a ratio established by using the population of the
county according to the latest available census, compared to the population of
the counties comprising the consolidated general sessions court using the latest
available census.
(3) For the purposes of this subsection (h) only, the compensation of the
judge must be based on what a judge of the next higher classification is to
receive on September 1, 2030.
(i)
- 2 - 010201

(1) If a county is in one class as provided in this section on September 1
of the year in which a judge is elected to office and after that date the county
moves into a lower class on the basis of a subsequent census, then the salary of
the judge must not be diminished during the time for which the judge was
elected.
(2) If a county is in one class as provided in this section on September 1
of the year in which a judge is elected to office and after that date the county
moves into a higher class on the basis of a subsequent census, then the salary
of the judge must be determined by the higher classification for the remainder of
the term for which the judge was elected and subsequent terms of office. A
judge's salary, for a county moving into a higher classification, must not be less
than the salary paid prior to the reclassification.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-15-5002, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
(e) Subsections (a)–(d) apply to judges until September 1, 2030, and are deleted
on September 1, 2030. Subsections (f)–(h) apply to judges on or after September 1,
2030. This subsection (e) is deleted on September 1, 2030.
(f) All general sessions judges in Class 1, 2, and 3 counties shall devote full time
to the duties of the office and are prohibited from the practice of law or any other
employment that conflicts with the performance of their duties as judge.
(g) General sessions judges in Class 4 and Class 5 counties are considered
part-time judges and are not prohibited from the practice of law or other gainful
employment while serving as judge, except to the extent the practice or employment
constitutes a conflict of interest.
- 3 - 010201

(h) Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, a judge of the general sessions
court in a county, upon adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of the
county legislative body, shall devote full time to the duties of the office and is prohibited
from the practice of law or any other employment that conflicts with the performance of
the judge's duties as judge.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-15-5003, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
(l) Subsections (a)–(k) apply to compensation, salaries, and adjustments for
general sessions judges until September 1, 2030, and are deleted on September 1,
2030. Subsections (m)–(aa) apply to compensation, salaries, and adjustments for
general sessions and juvenile judges on or after September 1, 2030. This subsection (l)
is deleted on September 1, 2030.
(m) The following counties shall continue to set the annual salaries for general
sessions judges exercising concurrent juvenile jurisdiction and juvenile judges by
existing private acts: Shelby, Davidson, Hamilton, Knox, Williamson, Montgomery,
Rutherford, Tipton, Henderson, Lake, Haywood, Putnam, Johnson, Henry, Gibson, and
Claibourne.
(n) Except for the counties listed in subsection (m), the annual salaries for
general sessions judges exercising concurrent juvenile jurisdiction and juvenile judges in
the following classes of counties are as follows:
(1) In counties of the first class, equal to the annual salary of a circuit
judge;
(2) In counties of the second class, five percent (5%) less than the
annual salary of a circuit judge;
- 4 - 010201

(3) In counties of the third class, fifteen percent (15%) less than the
annual salary of a circuit judge;
(4) In counties of the fourth class, twenty-five percent (25%) less than the
annual salary of a circuit judge; and
(5) In counties of the fifth class, thirty-five percent (35%) less than annual
salary of a circuit judge.
(o) The annual salaries for general sessions judges not exercising concurrent
juvenile jurisdiction, and juvenile judges not exercising concurrent general sessions
jurisdiction, in the following classes of counties are as follows:
(1) In counties of the first class, equal to the annual salary of a circuit
judge;
(2) In counties of the second class, five percent (5%) less than the
annual salary of a circuit judge;
(3) In counties of the third class, twenty percent (20%) less than the
annual salary of a circuit judge;
(4) In counties of the fourth class, thirty percent (30%) less than the
annual salary of a circuit judge; and
(5) In counties of the fifth class, forty percent (40%) less than the annual
salary of a circuit judge.
(p) Notwithstanding a law or this part to the contrary, a judge of a general
sessions court or juvenile judge must not be paid an annual salary that is greater than
the salary paid to a judge of a circuit court.
(q) Notwithstanding a law or this part to the contrary, a general sessions judge
who engages in the private practice of law must not receive an increase in annual salary
pursuant to this part if the judge is prohibited by law from engaging in private practice.
- 5 - 010201

(r) Beginning July 1, 2031, the annual compensation, salaries, and annual
adjustments established under this section must be adjusted annually in accordance
with § 8-23-103(2).
(s) The compensation and annual adjustment provisions of this part are
minimum levels.
(t) The compensation schedule established by this part is a comprehensive plan,
and a salary in excess of the annual salary provided by this part is not available to a
general sessions judge or juvenile judge, unless expressly provided and funded by a
private act.
(u) This part does not prohibit a county, by public or private act, from
compensating its general sessions judge or juvenile judges at levels in excess of what is
required by this part. A private or public act in effect on or after September 1, 2030, that
provides greater compensation for a general sessions judge than is required by this part
prevails over this part to the extent of the judge's amount of compensation.
(v) Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, a judge of a court of general sessions
or juvenile judge must not be paid compensation based on both this part and the
compensation provisions in a private act.
(w) Notwithstanding a law or public act to the contrary, effective September 1,
2030, the annual salary for a general sessions court judge or juvenile judge who is
compensated under this section must be increased over the annual compensation,
salary, supplements, and annual adjustments that each judge actually received as of
August 31, 2030, and the annual salary must not be decreased unless the county moves
into a lower class on the basis of a prior census.
(x) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, all general sessions court judges or
juvenile judges in Class 1-5 counties who are compensated under this part must receive
- 6 - 010201

the same compensation as the most highly compensated general sessions court judge
or juvenile judge in the same county classification with the same jurisdiction who is
compensated under this section.
(y) On or before June 30, 2030, each general sessions court judge and juvenile
judge shall certify to the administrative office of the courts (AOC) the total amount of the
judge's actual compensation as of August 31, 2030, the jurisdictions exercised by the
judge, the legal basis for exercising the jurisdiction, and whether the judge is
compensated under this section or under a public or private act. A certification of the
county's chief financial officer of the actual compensation of the judge as of August 31,
2030, or other verifiable proof of the judge's actual compensation, must be included in
the information submitted by the judge to the AOC. When all judges have certified the
required information to the AOC, the AOC shall report to each general sessions court
judge the amount of compensation to be paid to the general sessions court judge
beginning on September 1, 2030, based on the information provided by the judge.
Thereafter, when a new court is created, a new judge takes office, or a similar change
occurs, or upon the completion of a new census and reclassification of a county by
change of population, the AOC shall report the amount of compensation to be paid to a
judge affected by the change.
(z)
(1) Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, and except for the counties
listed in subsection (m), the general sessions and juvenile court costs must be
set and collected in the amount prescribed by general law and public or private
act. There is levied a county privilege tax on litigation in the following amounts in
each civil, criminal, juvenile, and traffic case initiated in a general sessions court
or juvenile court in Class 1-5 counties as follows:
- 7 - 010201

(A) One dollar ($1.00) in Class 1 counties;
(B) Two dollars ($2.00) in Class 2 counties;
(C) Three dollars ($3.00) in Class 3 counties;
(D) Four dollars ($4.00) in Class 4 counties; and
(E) Five dollars ($5.00) in Class 5 counties.
(2) The county litigation tax imposed by subdivision (z)(1) is due and
must be collected even if the party, litigant, defendant, or juvenile does not
appear in court. From the amount of tax collected, each county of each class
shall use it for the exclusive and sole purpose of defraying the compensation,
salary, and annual adjustments of the general sessions judges and juvenile
judges.
(aa) Each general sessions judge and juvenile judge, whether full-time or part-
time, shall continue to exercise the jurisdiction vested with, and exercising, on August
31, 2030, unless changed or modified as allowed by this chapter.
SECTION 4. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 8 - 010201